Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
Article 3 Agricultural Commodity Commission for Peanuts
2-8-74.
Referral of complaints to Attorney General or prosecuting attorney; hearing to consider charges; cease and desist order.

The commission on its own motion may, and upon the complaint of any interested party charging a violation of any provision of this article or of any provision of any marketing order or any rule or regulation issued by the commission and effective under this article shall, either refer the matter directly to the Attorney General of this state or to any prosecuting attorney of this state for the institution of legal proceedings thereupon or, if the commission deems it necessary or advisable, immediately call an administrative hearing, pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” governing contested cases, to consider the charges set forth in such verified complaint.

In case the matter is referred directly by the commission to the Attorney General or any prosecuting attorney, it shall be the duty of such officer, if after examination of the complaint and the evidence he believes that a violation has occurred, to bring an appropriate action or actions in a court or courts of competent jurisdiction in this state.

After an administrative hearing, if the commission finds that a violation has occurred, it shall enter its findings and notify the parties to such complaint. In its discretion, the commission shall either refer the matter to the Attorney General for the institution of legal proceedings or notify such parties to cease and desist from further violation. Upon the refusal or failure of such parties to comply or if the commission finds that the facts or circumstances warrant immediate prosecution, the commission shall file a complaint with the Attorney General or with any prosecuting attorney of this state requesting that such officer commence any or all actions authorized in this article against such respondent or respondents in a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-74

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-75.
False or fraudulent reports, statements, and records; failure or refusal to give name and address of person from whom peanuts received.

Any person who willfully renders or furnishes a false or fraudulent report, statement, or record required pursuant to this article or any marketing order effective under this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any person engaged in the handling or processing of peanuts or in the wholesale or retail trade thereof who fails or refuses to furnish, upon request, information concerning the name and address of the person from whom he has received peanuts regulated by a marketing order issued and in effect under this article and the quantity of such peanuts received shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-75

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 2.

2-8-76.
Criminal penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this article or any provision of any marketing order duly issued by the commission under this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-76

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-77.
Construction of penalty and remedy provisions.

The penalties and remedies prescribed in this article with respect to any violation mentioned shall be concurrent and alternative. Neither singly nor combined shall such penalties and remedies be exclusive; rather, either singly or combined, such penalties and remedies shall be cumulative with any and all other civil, criminal, or alternative rights, remedies, forfeitures, or penalties provided or allowed by law with respect to any such violation.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-77

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-78.
Applicability to retailers of peanuts.

This article shall not be applicable to any retailer of peanuts except to the extent that any retailer also engages in the processing or distribution of peanuts as defined in this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-78

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.

2-8-79.
Applicability of “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

The promulgation, adoption, and amendment of rules and regulations by the commission shall be subject to the requirements of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

2-8-79

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1420, § 1.